Alaska, session 34, SB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 11.71.100(a) is amended to read: 04 (a) The Controlled Substances Advisory Committee is established in the 05 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development [LAW]. The 06 committee consists of 07 (1) the attorney general or the attorney general's designee; 08 (2) the commissioner of family and community services or the 09 commissioner's designee; 10 (3) the commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's designee; 11 (4) the president of the Board of Pharmacy or the designee of the 12 president who shall also be a member of the Board of Pharmacy; 13 (5) a peace officer appointed by the governor after consultation with 14 the Alaska Association of Chiefs of Police; 15 (6) a physician appointed by the governor; 01 (7) a psychiatrist appointed by the governor; and 02 (8) two individuals appointed by the governor. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.